New York, session 2025-2026, S8046.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 10-b of section 4 of chapter 576 2 of the laws of 1974, constituting the emergency tenant protection act of 3 nineteen seventy-four, as added by section 6 of part K of chapter 36 of 4 the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 5 (c) The division shall establish, for regulated units located in any 6 city having a population of less than one million, or a town or village, 7 for which an emergency has been declared pursuant to section three of 8 this act, an annual inspection and audit process which shall review five 9 percent of individual apartment improvement notifications pursuant to 10 this section and the rules and regulations of the division. Such process 11 shall include individual inspections and document review to ensure that 12 owners complied with all obligations and responsibilities under the law 13 for individual apartment improvements. Inspections shall include in-per- 14 son confirmation that such improvements have been completed in such way 15 as described in the notification. In the event an audit finds that the 16 recoverable costs claimed by the landlord cannot be substantiated, 17 the resulting overcharge shall be considered to be willful. 18 (d) The division shall issue a notice to the landlord and all the 19 tenants sixty days prior to the end of the temporary major capital 20 improvement increase and shall include the initial approved increase and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13107-02-5 S. 8046--A 2 1 the total amount to be removed from the legal regulated rent inclusive 2 of any increases granted by the applicable rent guidelines board. 3 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 8-a of chapter 274 of the laws of 1946, 4 constituting the emergency housing rent control law is renumbered subdi- 5 vision 5 and two new subdivisions 3 and 4 are added to read as follows: 6 3. The division shall establish, for housing accommodations outside of 7 the city of New York, an annual inspection and audit process which shall 8 review five percent of individual apartment improvement notifications 9 pursuant to this section and the rules and regulations of the divi- 10 sion. Such process shall include individual inspections and document 11 review to ensure that owners complied with all obligations and 12 responsibilities under the law for individual apartment improvements. 13 Inspections shall include in-person confirmation that such improve- 14 ments have been completed in such way as described in the notification. 15 In the event an audit finds that the recoverable costs claimed by 16 the landlord cannot be substantiated, the resulting overcharge shall be 17 considered to be willful. 18 4. If the owner is found to have willfully overcharged a tenant as a 19 result of the conclusion of an audit pursuant to subdivision two or 20 three of this section, the division shall conduct additional audits of 21 all housing accommodations under their ownership in addition to the 22 penalties prescribed by this chapter. 23 § 3. Subdivision a of section 12 of section 4 of chapter 576 of the 24 laws of 1974, constituting the emergency tenant protection act of nine- 25 teen seventy-four, is amended by adding a new paragraph 1-a to read as 26 follows: 27 (1-a) If the owner is found to have willfully overcharged a tenant as 28 a result of the conclusion of an audit conducted pursuant to subdivision 29 (b) or (c) of section ten-b of this act, the division shall conduct 30 additional audits of all rent regulated units under their ownership in 31 addition to the penalties prescribed by this section. 32 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.